South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5127.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Capital Reserve Fund SECTION 1.    In accordance with the provisions of Section 36(B)(2) and (3), Article III, Constitution of South Carolina, 1895, and Section 11-11-320(C) and (D) of the S.C. Code, there is appropriated from the monies available in the Capital Reserve Fund for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 the following amounts: (1)    H510 Medical University of South Carolina Comprehensive Cancer Hospital                                                    $175,000,000 (2)    U120 Department of Transportation Bridge Modernization                                                                        $139,552,137 (3)    E240 Adjutant General's Office SCEMD - FEMA Match for Federally Declared Disasters            $72,800,000 Posting of appropriations SECTION 2.    The Comptroller General shall post the appropriations contained in this joint resolution as provided in Section 11-11-320(D) of the S.C. Code. Unexpended funds appropriated pursuant to this joint resolution may be carried forward to succeeding fiscal years and expended for the same purposes. Time effective SECTION 3.    This joint resolution takes effect thirty days after the completion of the 2025-2026 Fiscal Year in accordance with the provisions of Section 36(B)(3)(a), Article III, Constitution of South Carolina, 1895, and Section 11-11-320(D)(1) of the S.C. Code. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 15th day of May, 2026. -- T. ----XX----